North Carolina, session 2025, HB72.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 114-2.8, as enacted by Section 3D.1 of S.L. 2024-57, reads as
rewritten:
"§ 114-2.8. Limitation on participation in foreign certain litigation.
The Attorney General shall not, as a party, amicus, or any other participant in an action
pending before a state or federal court in another state, advance any argument that would result
in the invalidation of (i) any statute enacted by the General Assembly.Assembly or (ii) any
executive order issued by the President of the United States."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to actions filed
or commenced on or after that date.
*H72-v-1*